Massachusetts, session 194th, H1115.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17Z the following section:-
Section 17AA. The commission shall provide, to an active or retired employee of the
commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission, coverage for treatment of
vitiligo as a chronic autoimmune disease including, but not limited to, mental health treatment in
connection with vitiligo.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Z the following section:-
Section 10AA. The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall
of 3

provide coverage for treatment of vitiligo as a chronic autoimmune disease including, but not
limited to, mental health treatment in connection with vitiligo.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47CCC the following section:-
Section 47CCC. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for treatment
of vitiligo as a chronic autoimmune disease including, but not limited to, mental health treatment
in connection with vitiligo.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8CCC the following section:-
Section 8DDD. A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall provide coverage for treatment of vitiligo as a chronic autoimmune disease including, but
not limited to, mental health treatment in connection with vitiligo.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4CCC the following section:-
Section 4DDD. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for
treatment of vitiligo as a chronic autoimmune disease including, but not limited to, mental health
treatment in connection with vitiligo.
of 3

SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4VV the following section:-
Section 4WW. Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or
renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for treatment of vitiligo as
a chronic autoimmune disease including, but not limited to, mental health treatment in
connection with vitiligo.
of 3